Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1423XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1423XD (2) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 53.5 Absentee ballot marking pilot
program.
1. The state commissioner may adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 17A to implement a pilot program to establish
procedures to enable a voter with a disability that prevents
the voter from marking a ballot by hand to independently and
privately mark a ballot or use an electronic voting device that
produces a paper record using nonvisual access, low-vision
access, or other assistive technology in order for the voter to
complete an absentee ballot by mail pursuant to this chapter.
The procedures must include a method by which a voter with a
disability that prevents the voter from marking a ballot by
hand to request an absentee ballot by mail.
2. If the pilot program under this section is not
implemented statewide, the pilot program must include a
sufficient number of counties, as determined by the state
commissioner, to conclude whether the program is feasible
statewide.
3. The state commissioner shall file a report with the
general assembly by December 31 of each year regarding the
pilot program established under this section.
4. This section is repealed July 1, 2026.